Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.430

Abandonment of commission form.

Any city which has operated under the commission form for more than six years may again reorganize as a noncommission city without changing its classification unless it desires to do so.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.430. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 23, part; RRS s 9112, part.]